Idaho, session 2025, H0414.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 35, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-3520, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-3520. IDAHO PERSONNEL REDUCTION ACT. (1) It is the intent of the
legislature that the Idaho state government performs its duties and serves
the public interest as well and efficiently as practicable. Discovering and
eliminating government waste will save taxpayer dollars while increasing
public confidence in the responsibility and integrity of Idaho state govern-
ment.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Department" means a department, agency, institution, or office of
the state of Idaho that receives a legislative appropriation for per-
sonnel costs.
(b) "FTP" means full-time equivalent positions.
(3) On or before September 1, 2025, and annually on or before each
September 1 thereafter, every department shall identify the number of cur-
rently vacant appropriated FTP, including portions of FTP, within such
department that were vacant for more than one hundred eighty (180) calendar
days as of the end of the previous fiscal year.
(4) Vacant FTP identified in subsection (3) of this section shall be
eliminated, and the amount budgeted for the payment of salaries and wages,
including associated fringe benefits, of such eliminated FTP shall be re-
duced in the department's annual budget submission pursuant to section
67-3502, Idaho Code. Alternatively, if the vacant FTP, or portion of FTP,
has been vacant for less than one (1) year, a department may request to retain
it and shall fully fund the vacant FTP, or portion of FTP, from its existing
funds and shall fill the vacancy as soon as practicable.
(5) The number of FTP identified in subsection (3) of this section shall
be detailed in the department's annual budget submission required pursuant
to section 67-3502, Idaho Code, together with the following information:
(a) Each individual vacant FTP or portion of FTP by job title;
(b) The length of time the position has been vacant;


(c) The job description associated with the position;
(d) Whether there is funding available to fill the FTP and, if so, the
source of such funds;
(e) The reason why the FTP remains vacant; and
(f) Whether the department has reduced the FTP from its budget submis-
sion or is requesting that the FTP be retained.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 35, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-3520A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-3520A. REPORTING OF IDAHO STATE EMPLOYEE TRAVEL EXPENSES. (1) Con-
sistent with the legislative intent provided for in section 67-3520, Idaho
Code, it is also the intent of the legislature to discover and eliminate gov-
ernment waste involving state employee travel in order to save taxpayer dol-
lars while increasing public confidence in the responsibility and integrity
of Idaho state government.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Department" means a department, agency, institution, or office of
the state of Idaho that receives a legislative appropriation for per-
sonnel costs.
(b) "Travel expenses" means costs associated with reimbursement of
travel or subsistence pursuant to the standard travel pay and allowance
act of 1949, chapter 20, title 67, Idaho Code.
(3) All travel expenses from the preceding fiscal year shall be de-
tailed in the department's annual budget submission required pursuant to
section 67-3502, Idaho Code, including detail regarding the following in-
formation:
(a) Total travel expenses of the department;
(b) Identification of all travel occurrences and the purposes of such
travel;
(c) Travel destinations;
(d) Airfare, mileage, car rental, lodging, food, conference fees, and
other expenses;
(e) Dates of travel; and
(f) Portions of any travel expenses that were paid by an entity other
than the state of Idaho.
SECTION 3. That Title 74, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 8, Title 74, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 8
TRANSPARENCY IN TRAVEL BY STATE OFFICIALS
74-801. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature to
promote public confidence in government and to promote transparency by re-
quiring candidates for statewide offices, statewide elected officials, and
officers-elect of statewide offices to report travel paid for by others.


74-802. REPORTING OF PAID TRAVEL -- PENALTY. (1) All state officials
shall report to the secretary of state all travel outside of Idaho reasonably
related to a governmental purpose or to an issue of state, national, or in-
ternational public policy paid for by another individual or entity. Travel
paid through campaign funds that are reported pursuant to chapter 66, title
67, Idaho Code, or solely through personal funds of a state official shall
not be subject to the requirements of this section. For the purposes of this
section, "state official" means a candidate for statewide office who will
appear on a general election ballot, a statewide elected official, and an of-
ficer-elect of any statewide office who has prevailed in a general election
but has not yet received the oath of office.
(2) Within thirty (30) days of the return date of any travel subject
to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, a state official who is
subject to the reporting requirements provided for in subsection (1) of this
section shall file a report with the secretary of state that includes:
(a) The travel destination;
(b) The dates of travel;
(c) The purpose of the travel; and
(d) The name and address of the person or entity that paid for the
travel, including whether the travel was a campaign contribution and,
in the case of currently serving state officials, whether the travel was
made in such state official's capacity as a state official.
(3) Any state official who fails to file the report required pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section within thirty (30) days shall be subject
to a late fee in the amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) each day until
the report is filed, which fee shall be deposited in the public school income
fund.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.